New Jersey, session 221, S2540.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Attorney General shall provide a means for email notification to any person who requests to be notified pursuant to subsection b. of this section when a sex offender, whose registration information is posted on the Internet pursuant to P.L.2001, c.167 (C.2C:7-12 et seq.), registers a new address in a different county or zip code from the offenders previous address or when any other information concerning that sex offender is updated on the registry. b.    A person may request to receive notification by email pursuant to subsection a. of this section for updated information for not more than three counties or zip codes. c.     The Attorney General shall promulgate guidelines to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month after enactment.